District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.53

Georgetown BID.

(a)

The formation of the Georgetown BID, which shall include all taxable property zoned C or W under applicable District zoning law within the geographic areas set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is hereby authorized and the BID taxes established in subsection (c) of this section are hereby imposed through the earlier of the expiration date of this subchapter [May 29, 2016] or the termination or dissolution of the BID.

(b)

The Georgetown BID shall be comprised of all taxable property zoned C or W under applicable District zoning law within the following areas: along the northern boundary of M Street, N.W., between the western terminus of the Rock Creek bridge on the east and the eastern boundary of Georgetown University on the west; along 28th Street, N.W., between M Street, N.W., and Olive Street, N.W.; along 29th Street, N.W., and 30th Street, N.W., in each instance between the M Street, N.W., and Olive Street, N.W.; along 31st Street, N.W., between M Street N.W., and N Street, N.W.; along Potomac Street, N.W., 33rd Street, N.W., Bank Street, N.W., 34th Street, N.W., and 35th Street, N.W., in each instance between M Street, N.W., and Prospect Street, N.W.; along Prospect Street, N.W., between Wisconsin Avenue, N.W., and Potomac Street, N.W.; along N Street, N.W., between 31st Street, N.W., and Potomac Street, N.W.; along O Street, N.W., between 31st Street, N.W., and Potomac Street, N.W.; along Dumbarton Street, N.W., between 31st Street, N.W., and Wisconsin Avenue, N.W.; along P Street, N.W., between 32nd Street, N.W., and 33rd Street, N.W.; along Volta Street, N.W., between Wisconsin Avenue, N.W., and 33rd Street, N.W.; along Q Street, N.W., between 32nd Street, N.W., and 33rd Street, N.W.; along 33rd Street, N.W., between Dent Place, N.W., and Wisconsin Avenue, N.W.; along Reservoir Road, N.W., between 32nd Street, N.W., and 34th Street, N.W.; along R Street, N.W., between 32nd Street, N.W., and 34th Street, N.W.; along Wisconsin Avenue, N.W., between M Street, N.W., and R Street, N.W., and within the area bounded on the north by the southern boundary of M Street, N.W., on the east by Rock Creek, on the west by Key Bridge, and on the south by the Potomac River, which area also includes that portion of Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., between 29th Street, N.W., and Rock Creek.

(c)

(1)

The BID taxes for taxable properties zoned C or W under applicable District zoning law in the Georgetown BID shall be:

(A)

Fifteen cents per $100 of the assessed value of all taxable properties and all taxable portions of mixed use properties for each Class 3, 4, 5 and 9 taxable property within the described geographic area, and for each Class 6, 7, 8, 10, 11, and 12 mixed use property within the described geographic area for which an assessed value for the taxable portion of such property reasonably is ascertainable from District tax records; and

(B)

Fifteen cents per $100 of assessed value of all taxable portions for Class 6, 7, 8, 10, 11, and 12 mixed use property within the described geographic area for which an assessed value for the taxable portion of such property reasonably is not ascertainable from District tax records, determined as follows:

(i)

The aggregate square foot area for that portion of a mixed use property which is Class 3, 4, or 5 shall be adjusted in each instance by multiplying such square foot area by a factor of 2.7 (which adjusted square footage is referred to herein as the “Adjusted Taxable Area”); and

(ii)

The taxable portion of a mixed use property shall be deemed to be an adjusted fraction, the numerator of which shall be the Adjusted Taxable Area and the denominator of which shall be the Adjusted Taxable Area plus the square foot area for the residential portion of such mixed use property (which fraction is referred to herein as the “Adjusted Taxable Portion”); and

(iii)

The assessed value of each such mixed use property for purposes of the BID tax shall be deemed to be the Adjusted Taxable Portion thereof.

(2)

For the purposes of determining the BID tax under paragraphs (1) of this subsection, the “assessed value” of each taxable property and each mixed use property for the entire 5-year term of the BID shall be fixed at the assessed value of each such property as it appears on the assessment roll of the District of Columbia as of the date of registration of the BID and irrespective of any subsequent reassessment, subject however, to the express exception that the “assessed value” of any taxable property and any mixed use property shall increase based upon and effective as of any reassessment by the District of Columbia following either (A) a sale of any property or (B) a reclassification of any property from Class 5 (vacant land and vacant buildings) to a taxable property or a mixed use property or a reclassification of any exempt property, or any residential portion of any mixed use property, to a taxable property.

(3)

A 5% annual increase in the BID taxes over the current tax year rates specified in subsection (a) of this section is hereby authorized and imposed subject to the requirements of § 2-1215.08(b).

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 203
as added Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 2(d), 52 DCR 1161
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 140(c), 52 DCR 10637
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(r), 61 DCR 10741
D.C. Law 16-91 made a technical change in the enacting clause of D.C. Law 15-257 which resulted in no change in text.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt real” throughout the section; and substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt” throughout (c).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(r) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(r) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735).
Extension of the term of the Georgetown Business Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.01 et seq. (2003 Supp.)), see Mayor’s Order 2004-173, October 20, 2004 ( 51 DCR 10495).